Maryland, session 2026, SB0284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
2–1901.
(a) (1) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Program” means the Maryland Healthy Soils Program.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(b) There is a Maryland Healthy Soils Program.
(e) (1) In each of fiscal years 2024 through [2028] 2026, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $500,000 for the Program.
(2) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $400,000
FOR THE PROGRAM.
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Native Plant Specialist” means the University of Maryland Extension agent
hired under § 10–403 of this subtitle.
(e) “Program” means the Maryland Native Plants Program.
10–402.
(a) There is a Maryland Native Plants Program.
10–407.
(d) For fiscal year 2025 and [each fiscal year thereafter] FISCAL YEAR 2026, the
Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $150,000 for the
University of Maryland Extension to hire one extension agent as a Native Plant Specialist
and $100,000 for the Department to hire staff to administer the Program.
Article – Economic Development
5–1901.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Cannabis Business Assistance Fund.
(b) There is a Cannabis Business Assistance Fund.
(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Fund may be used only
for:
(i) grants or loans to small, minority–owned, or women–owned
businesses for:
– 9 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. license application assistance for participation in the
adult–use cannabis industry;
2. assistance with the operating or capital expenses of a
business participating in the adult–use cannabis industry; or
3. targeted training to support participation in the adult–use
cannabis industry;
(ii) grants to historically black colleges and universities for
cannabis–related programs and business development organizations, including incubators,
to train and assist small, minority, and women business owners and entrepreneurs seeking
to become licensed to participate in the adult–use cannabis industry; [and]
(III) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, OPERATING COSTS
UP TO $5,000,000 OF THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY; AND
[(iii)] (IV) the administrative costs of the Fund.
(3) In order to award grants and loans in accordance with paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the Department shall develop partnerships with:
(iii) the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business
Affairs.
13–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Council” means the Tri–County Council for Southern Maryland.
13–611.
(b) (3) (i) The Governor shall include in the State budget for the following
fiscal year an appropriation to partially support the Council.
(ii) 1. A. For [fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year
thereafter] FISCAL YEARS 2024 THROUGH 2026, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill an appropriation of $1,000,000 to the Council from the Cigarette
Restitution Fund established under § 7–317 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
B. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN
APPROPRIATION OF $700,000 TO THE COUNCIL FROM THE CIGARETTE
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
RESTITUTION FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–317 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
2. The Council shall use funds appropriated from the
Cigarette Restitution Fund for the purpose of funding the activities of the Southern
Maryland Agricultural Development Commission.
3. The appropriation required under subsubparagraph 1 of
this subparagraph shall be in addition to, and may not supplant, any funding appropriated
to the Council.
Article – Education
2–305.
(b) (1) There is a Lacrosse Opportunities Program in the Department.
(2) The purpose of the Lacrosse Opportunities Program is to increase
opportunities for minority students to participate in lacrosse in their communities.
(g) For fiscal year 2014 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor [shall] MAY
include in the annual budget submission at least $40,000 for the Lacrosse Opportunities
Program.
7–1A–01.
(l) “Tier II child” means a child:
(1) Who is 4 years old;
(2) (i) In fiscal year 2026, whose family income is more than 300% but
not more than 360% of the federal poverty level; [and]
(ii) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, WHOSE FAMILY INCOME IS MORE
THAN 300% BUT NOT MORE THAN 450% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL; AND
(III) In fiscal year [2027] 2028 and in each fiscal year thereafter,
whose family income is more than 300% but not more than 600% of the federal poverty
level; and
(3) Whose family chooses to enroll the child in full–day prekindergarten.
7–447.1.
(p) (1) In this subsection, “Fund” means the Coordinated Community Supports
Partnership Fund.
– 11 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) The purpose of the Fund is to support the delivery of services and
supports provided to students to meet their holistic behavioral health needs and address
other related challenges.
(9) The Governor shall include in the annual budget bill the following
appropriations for the Fund:
(vi) [$100,000,000] $80,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal
year thereafter.
11–602.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Legal Representation Fund for Title IX
Proceedings.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funds for reasonable costs and attorney’s
fees for students provided with counsel under § 11–601 of this subtitle.
(j) Beginning in fiscal year 2021, the Governor shall include in the annual budget
bill an appropriation of at least $250,000 to the [Fund] PROGRAM.
16–305.
(a) The formula used for the distribution of funds to the community colleges in
the State shall be known as the Senator John A. Cade Funding Formula.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(11) “State share” means the amount of money for community college
operating funds to be provided each fiscal year to a board by the State.
(c) (3) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the total State share for each
board shall be the sum of:
(i) The base costs component; and
(ii) The size factor component.
(d) (1) In each fiscal year, in order for a board to receive an increase in the
State share of support, the county share, in the aggregate, that supports the community
college or colleges shall equal or exceed the aggregate amount of operating fund
appropriations made to the board by the county or all of the counties supporting the college
in the previous fiscal year.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(2) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE STATE SHARE, AS
DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(3) OF THIS SECTION, MAY NOT EXCEED AN
INCREASE OF 3% OVER THE STATE SHARE PROVIDED TO EACH COMMUNITY
COLLEGE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
16–512.
(a) In this section, “State Funds per full–time equivalent student appropriation
to the 4–year public institutions of higher education” has the meaning stated in §
17–104(a)(1) of this article.
(b) (1) The total State operating fund per full–time equivalent student
appropriated to Baltimore City Community College for each fiscal year other than fiscal
year 2013, as requested by the Governor shall be:
(xiii) In fiscal year 2022, not less than an amount equal to 66.5% of the
State’s General Fund appropriation per full–time equivalent student to the 4–year public
institutions of higher education in the State as designated by the Commission for the
purpose of administering the Joseph A. Sellinger Program under Title 17 of this article in
the same fiscal year; [and]
(xiv) In fiscal [year 2023 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2023
THROUGH 2026, not less than an amount equal to 68.5% of the State Funds per full–time
equivalent student appropriation to the 4–year public institutions of higher education in
the State as designated by the Commission for the purpose of administering the Joseph A.
Sellinger Program under Title 17 of this article; AND
(XV) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER
YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, NOT LESS THAN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 67.5% OF THE
STATE FUNDS PER FULL–TIME EQUIVALENT STUDENT APPROPRIATION TO THE
4–YEAR PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE AS
DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING THE
JOSEPH A. SELLINGER PROGRAM UNDER TITLE 17 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(XVI) IN FISCAL YEAR 2030 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
NOT LESS THAN AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 68.5% OF THE STATE FUNDS PER FULL–TIME
EQUIVALENT STUDENT APPROPRIATION TO THE 4–YEAR PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE AS DESIGNATED BY THE COMMISSION FOR THE
PURPOSE OF ADMINISTERING THE JOSEPH A. SELLINGER PROGRAM UNDER TITLE
17 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, the State Funds per full–time
equivalent student appropriation to the 4–year public institutions of higher education in
the State for a fiscal year shall include:
– 13 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Noncapital appropriations from the Higher Education
Investment Fund; and
(ii) Appropriations, regardless of where they are budgeted,
designated for the general operation of 4–year public institutions of higher education in the
State, including personnel–related appropriations.
17–101.
There is a program of State aid to private nonprofit institutions of higher education
known as the Joseph A. Sellinger Program.
17–104.
(a) (1) (i) In this subsection, “State Funds per full–time equivalent student
appropriation to the 4–year public institutions of higher education” shall be calculated in
accordance with this paragraph using the General Fund and Higher Education Investment
Fund actual expenditures for the second previous fiscal year.
(ii) The total number of full–time equivalent students is based on
credit hour production for the second previous fiscal year.
(iii) The number of undergraduate full–time equivalent students
shall be calculated using total undergraduate credit hour production divided by 30.
(iv) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, the number of graduate full–time equivalent students shall be calculated
based on a methodology agreed to by the University System of Maryland Office, Morgan
State University, and St. Mary’s College of Maryland, in consultation with the Commission.
2. If a methodology is not agreed to on or before September
16, 2024, the Commission shall determine the methodology used to calculate the number
of graduate full–time equivalent students.
(v) The Commission shall certify the number of full–time equivalent
students for each institution on or before October 1 each year.
(2) (I) [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IN fiscal year 2025 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Maryland Higher
Education Commission shall compute the amount of the annual apportionment for each
institution that qualifies under this subtitle by multiplying the number of full–time
equivalent undergraduate students enrolled at the institution during the fall semester of
the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year for which the aid apportionment is made, as
determined by the Maryland Higher Education Commission, by an amount not less than
16.1% of the State Funds per full–time equivalent student appropriation to the 4–year
public institutions of higher education in this State.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(II) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE
ANNUAL APPORTIONMENT FOR EACH INSTITUTION THAT QUALIFIES UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE IS:
1. CAPITOL TECHNOLOGY UNIVERSITY – $914,981;
2. GOUCHER COLLEGE – $3,168,940;
3. HOOD COLLEGE – $3,611,811;
4. JOHNS HOPKINS UNIVERSITY – $20,554,298;
5. LOYOLA UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND – $12,550,328;
6. MARYLAND INSTITUTE COLLEGE OF ART –
$3,745,718;
7. MCDANIEL COLLEGE – $5,945,264;
8. MOUNT ST. MARY’S UNIVERSITY – $5,476,872;
9. NOTRE DAME OF MARYLAND UNIVERSITY –
$2,037,187;
10. ST. JOHN’S COLLEGE – $1,701,410;
11. STEVENSON UNIVERSITY – $9,206,521;
12. WASHINGTON ADVENTIST UNIVERSITY – $1,367,650;
AND
13. WASHINGTON COLLEGE – $3,041,744.
(d) For purposes of this section, the State’s General Fund appropriation per
full–time equivalent student to the 4–year public institutions of higher education in the
State for a fiscal year shall include:
(1) Noncapital appropriations from the Higher Education Investment
Fund; and
(2) Appropriations, regardless of where they are budgeted, designated for
the general operation of 4–year public institutions of higher education in the State,
including personnel–related appropriations.
– 15 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
18–3602.
(a) There is a program of Maryland Community College Promise Scholarships in
the State that are awarded under this subtitle.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide tuition assistance for students to
attend a community college in the State.
18–3605.
(a) Through fiscal year 2025, the Governor shall include an annual appropriation
of at least $15,000,000 in the State budget for the Commission to disburse Maryland
Community College Promise Scholarships under this subtitle.
(b) For fiscal year 2026 [and each fiscal year thereafter], the Governor shall
include an annual appropriation of at least $13,500,000 in the State budget for the
Commission to disburse Maryland Community College Promise Scholarships under this
subtitle.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE AN ANNUAL APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $12,500,000
IN THE STATE BUDGET FOR THE COMMISSION TO DISBURSE MARYLAND
COMMUNITY COLLEGE PROMISE SCHOLARSHIPS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
18–3701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Program” means the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for
Police Officers and Probation Agents.
18–3704.
(a) For fiscal year 2025, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation of at least $500,000 for the Program.
(b) For fiscal year 2026 [and each fiscal year thereafter], the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $2,000,000 for the Program.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
AT LEAST $500,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
18–3802.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(a) There is a Maryland Police Officers and Probation Agents Scholarship
Program.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide tuition assistance for students who
are:
(1) Attending an eligible institution and enrolled in a degree program that
would further the student’s intent to become a police officer or probation agent after
graduation; or
(2) Employed as a police officer or probation agent, attending an eligible
institution, and enrolled in a degree program that would further the police officer’s or
probation officer’s career.
18–3806.
(a) For fiscal year 2025, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an
appropriation of at least $500,000 to the Commission to award scholarships under this
subtitle.
(b) For fiscal year 2026 [and each fiscal year thereafter], the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $2,000,000 to the Commission
to award scholarships under this subtitle.
(C) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF
AT LEAST $500,000 TO THE COMMISSION TO AWARD SCHOLARSHIPS UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
Article – Health – General
5–626.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Advance Directive Program Fund.
(b) There is an Advance Directive Program Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide funding to carry out the purposes of the
Advance Directive Program established under § 5–620 of this subtitle.
(g) (1) [Money] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, MONEY in the Fund may be used only to carry out the purposes of the
Advance Directive Program established under § 5–620 of this subtitle.
– 17 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, $1,000,000 OF THE FUND MAY BE
USED FOR MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH QUALITY INITIATIVES IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
10–6A–03.
(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, a county may establish an assisted outpatient
treatment program in accordance with this subtitle.
(2) A county may partner with another county to establish an assisted
outpatient treatment program.
(b) An assisted outpatient treatment program established under subsection (a) of
this section shall be approved and overseen by the county’s local behavioral health
authority or core service agency.
(c) (1) On or before July 1, 2026, the Department shall establish an assisted
outpatient treatment program in any county that does not opt to establish an assisted
outpatient treatment program.
(2) A COUNTY IN WHICH THE DEPARTMENT IS REQUIRED TO
ESTABLISH AN ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT PROGRAM SHALL REIMBURSE
THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) FOR EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, FOR 25% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS;
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, FOR 50% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS;
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, FOR 75% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS; AND
(IV) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031, FOR 100% OF THE STATE SHARE OF
ASSOCIATED COSTS.
(3) (I) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 31, 2026, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
PROVIDE TO EACH COUNTY THE NUMBER OF ASSISTED OUTPATIENT TREATMENT
PROGRAM PARTICIPANTS IN THE COUNTY AND THE ESTIMATED ANNUAL COST TO
PROVIDE TREATMENT TO THOSE PARTICIPANTS.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE OBLIGATION TO PROVIDE 25%
OF THE STATE SHARE OF ASSOCIATED COSTS SHALL BE WAIVED FOR ANY COUNTY
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
THAT PROVIDES A REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027,
ON THE COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS OF THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE ASSISTED
OUTPATIENT TREATMENT PROGRAM ON THE COUNTY BUDGET AND OPERATIONS.
13–1015.
(a) For fiscal year 2011 and fiscal year 2012, the Governor shall include at least
$6,000,000 in the annual budget in appropriations for activities aimed at reducing tobacco
use in Maryland as recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention,
including:
(1) Media campaigns aimed at reducing smoking initiation and
encouraging smokers to quit smoking;
(2) Media campaigns educating the public about the dangers of secondhand
smoke exposure;
(3) Enforcement of existing laws banning the sale or distribution of tobacco
products to individuals under the age of 21 years;
(4) Promotion and implementation of smoking cessation programs; and
(5) Implementation of school–based tobacco education programs.
(b) (1) For fiscal years 2013 through 2021, the Governor shall include at least
$10,000,000 in the annual budget in appropriations for the purposes described in
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) For fiscal [year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2022
THROUGH 2026, the Governor shall include at least $18,250,000 in the annual budget in
appropriations for the purposes described in subsection (a) of this section.
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE AT LEAST $17,520,000 IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET IN
APPROPRIATIONS FOR THE PURPOSES DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
13–5602.
(a) There is a Population Health Improvement Fund.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the Fund may be used only for expenses
associated with statewide population health improvement initiatives in alignment with the
statewide health equity plan as directed by the Secretary.
– 19 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) [Activities] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ACTIVITIES paid for by the Fund must support the goal of meeting the
statewide population health targets outlined in the AHEAD Model State Agreement with the
[Center] CENTERS for Medicare and Medicaid Services and have at least one of the
following functions:
(i) Reducing rates of common preventable health conditions;
(ii) Addressing health–related social needs; or
(iii) Reducing or eliminating health disparities.
(3) IN CALENDAR YEAR 2026 ONLY, UP TO $14,000,000 IN THE FUND
MAY BE USED TO FUND EXPENSES OF THE MEDICAL CARE PROGRAMS
ADMINISTRATION WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT IF THE HEALTH SERVICES COST
REVIEW COMMISSION INCREASES HOSPITAL RATES TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE TO MEDICARE ADVANTAGE PLANS.
21–2A–02.
(a) There is a Prescription Drug Monitoring Program in the Department.
21–2A–04.
(a) The Secretary, in consultation with the Board, shall adopt regulations to carry
out this subtitle.
(b) The regulations adopted by the Secretary shall:
(1) Specify the prescription monitoring data and naloxone medication data
required to be submitted under § 21–2A–03 of this subtitle;
(8) Establish requirements for Program retention of prescription
monitoring data and naloxone medication data [for 3 years]; and
(9) Require that:
(i) Confidential or privileged patient information be kept
confidential; and
(ii) Records or information protected by a privilege between a health
care provider and a patient, or otherwise required by law to be held confidential, be filed in
a manner that, except as otherwise provided in §§ 21–2A–06 and 21–2A–06.1 of this
subtitle, does not disclose the identity of the person protected.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
Article – Health Occupations
14–207.
(a) There is a Board of Physicians Fund.
(e) (1) (I) The Fund shall be used exclusively to cover the actual
documented direct and indirect costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of the
Board as provided by this title.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, $2,000,000 OF THE FUND
BALANCE MAY BE USED TO SUPPORT THE PROGRAMS IN THE OFFICE OF
POPULATION HEALTH IMPROVEMENT WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT.
17–206.
(a) There is a State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists Fund.
(d) (1) (I) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE Fund shall be used to cover the actual documented direct and indirect
costs of fulfilling the statutory and regulatory duties of the Board as provided by the
provisions of this article.
(II) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, $500,000 OF THE FUND
BALANCE MAY BE USED TO SUPPORT PROGRAMS IN THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADMINISTRATION OF THE DEPARTMENT.
Article – Insurance
1–101.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Insurance Administration.
15–148.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
– 21 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ORDER THE TRANSFER OF FUNDS FROM
EACH ENTITY MAINTAINING A SEGREGATED ACCOUNT IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
1303(B)(2)(B) AND (C) OF THE FEDERAL PATIENT PROTECTION AND AFFORDABLE
CARE ACT TO THE DEDICATED PURPOSE ACCOUNT FOR THE PURPOSES OF HEALTH
CARE ACCESS GRANTS AS FOLLOWS:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, 90% OF THE AMOUNT OF THE
ENDING BALANCE OF THE SEGREGATED ACCOUNT THAT EXCEEDS DISBURSEMENTS
FOR EACH OF THE PLAN YEARS 2014 THROUGH 2024; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, 90%
OF THE AMOUNT OF THE ENDING BALANCE OF A SEGREGATED ACCOUNT THAT
EXCEEDS DISBURSEMENTS AFTER THE 15–MONTH PERIOD FOLLOWING THE END OF
A PLAN YEAR.
Article – Labor and Employment
11–603.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(3) “Program” means the Public Safety Apprenticeship Program.
(g) (1) For fiscal [year 2021 and each fiscal year thereafter] YEARS 2021
THROUGH 2025, the Governor shall include in the State budget an appropriation of at
least $750,000 for the Program to:
[(1)] (I) provide grants to eligible public safety agencies; and
[(2)] (II) cover the administrative costs of operating the Program.
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE STATE BUDGET AN APPROPRIATION OF AT
LEAST $390,000 FOR THE PROGRAM TO:
(I) PROVIDE GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE PUBLIC SAFETY AGENCIES;
AND
(II) COVER THE ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS OF OPERATING THE
PROGRAM.
11–1501.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Program” means the Career Pathways for Health Care Workers Program.
11–1506.
(a) (1) Through fiscal year 2024, the Governor shall include in the annual
budget bill an appropriation of at least $1,000,000 for the Program.
(2) For fiscal [year] YEARS 2025 and [each fiscal year thereafter] 2026,
the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of at least $500,000
for the Program.
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF AT LEAST $350,000 FOR THE PROGRAM.
(b) Appropriations and expenditures made for the purpose of implementing the
Program, including the use of any funds received by a person under any component of the
Program, are subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as provided in § 2–1220 of
the State Government Article.
Article – Land Use
14–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission.
18–106.
(a) After public notice, each county council shall hold a public hearing on the
Commission’s proposed budgets at least 21 days after receiving the budgets from the county
executive.
(b) On or before June 1 of each year, each county council shall, by resolution:
(1) approve the portion of the budgets allocable to that county, with any
alterations made under subsection (c) of this section; and
(2) subject to the requirements and limitations of Subtitles 3 and 4 of this
title and Title 21 of this article, impose taxes in the amounts the county council determines
to be necessary to finance the portion of the budgets allocable to that county.
– 23 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) [Each] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, EACH
county council may add to, delete from, increase, or decrease any part of the budgets
allocable solely to that county.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY IN PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(II) IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, THE COUNTY COUNCIL MAY
NOT ALLOCATE ANY PART OF THE BUDGETS ALLOCABLE SOLELY TO THE COUNTY TO:
1. THE COUNTY COUNCIL; OR
2. UNLESS APPROVED ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1 IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
A. THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY GOVERNMENT,
INCLUDING A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OF THE COUNTY; OR
B. ANY THIRD–PARTY BUSINESS ENTITY OR INDIVIDUAL.
(d) (1) Budget items allocable to both counties as submitted by the Commission
shall be concurred in by both county councils.
(2) The county councils may concur in additions to, deletions from,
increases to, or decreases from budget items allocable to both counties.
(3) Failure of the county councils to concur in any budget item allocable to
both counties by June 15 shall constitute approval of the item as submitted by the
Commission.
25–101.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
25–102.
EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS DIVISION, THE COUNTY PLANNING
BOARD MAY NOT MAKE OR AWARD GRANTS.
Article – Local Government
16–501.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(a) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, for each fiscal year, the Comptroller shall pay to
an eligible county a grant in the amount determined under subsection (c)(3) of this section.
(2) IN EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2029, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL PAY TO THE FOLLOWING COUNTIES AND BALTIMORE CITY
THE FOLLOWING AMOUNTS IN QUARTERLY PAYMENTS:
(I) ALLEGANY COUNTY – $7,298,505;
(II) BALTIMORE CITY – $79,051,790;
(III) CAROLINE COUNTY – $3,894,753;
(IV) DORCHESTER COUNTY – $4,159,010;
(V) GARRETT COUNTY – $2,047,408;
(VI) PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY – $56,889,464;
(VII) SOMERSET COUNTY – $7,251,732;
(VIII) WASHINGTON COUNTY – $2,507,251; AND
(IX) WICOMICO COUNTY – $13,502,951.
(b) A county may not receive a grant under subsection (a) of this section if any of
the county’s income tax rates were less than 2.6%:
(1) for the taxable year that ended in the second prior fiscal year; or
(2) for any subsequent taxable year through the taxable year that ends in
the current fiscal year.
16–505.
(a) (1) For each of fiscal years 2025 [through 2028] AND 2026, the Governor
shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $500,000 to the Prince George’s
County Office of the County Executive to be used for the Prince George’s County Reentry
Employment Incentive Program under § 10–334 of the Prince George’s County Code.
(2) FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 AND 2028, THE GOVERNOR
SHALL INCLUDE IN THE BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $350,000 TO THE
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY OFFICE OF THE COUNTY EXECUTIVE TO BE USED FOR
– 25 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY REENTRY EMPLOYMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM
UNDER § 10–334 OF THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY CODE.
(b) The funds provided under this section shall be supplemental to, and may not
supplant, funds otherwise available for reentry employment incentives in Prince George’s
County.
Article – Natural Resources
8–709.
(e) (1) (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for fiscal year 2026
[and each fiscal year thereafter], the Department shall distribute at least $250,000 from
the Waterway Improvement Fund to a statewide Maryland–based historic preservation
nonprofit organization with demonstrated experience in grantmaking.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, FOR
FISCAL YEAR 2029 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
DISTRIBUTE AT LEAST $250,000 FROM THE WATERWAY IMPROVEMENT FUND TO A
STATEWIDE MARYLAND–BASED HISTORIC PRESERVATION NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION WITH DEMONSTRATED EXPERIENCE IN GRANTMAKING.
(2) A nonprofit organization shall use any funds received under this
subsection to establish, operate, and administer a maritime heritage competitive grant
program to provide grants to nonprofit organizations in the State and instrumentalities of
the State, counties, or municipalities engaged in maritime heritage preservation,
interpretation, or conservation.
(3) On or before November 30 each year, a nonprofit organization that
receives funds under this subsection shall submit a report to the Department on the
guidelines, promotion, selection, recipients, and impact of the organization’s competitive
grant program.
Article – Public Safety
1–308.
(a) There is a 9–1–1 Trust Fund.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to §
1–309.1 of this subtitle, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund are to:
(i) reimburse counties for the cost of enhancing a 9–1–1 system;
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(ii) pay contractors in accordance with § 1–306(b)(12) of this subtitle;
and
(iii) fund the coordinator position and staff to handle the increased
duties related to wireless enhanced 9–1–1 service under § 1–305 of this subtitle, as an
administrative cost.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, in addition to the purposes
described under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund
include funding:
(x) costs of telecommunications cardiopulmonary resuscitation
training; [and]
(xi) costs related to the operation of the 9–8–8 suicide prevention
hotline that may be shared with 9–1–1 activities, including software interfaces and joint
training; AND
(XII) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, PROGRAM OPERATIONS OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT.
4–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of
Crime Prevention and Policy.
(k) “Qualifying municipality” means a municipality that:
(1) (i) has expenditures for police protection that exceed $5,000; and
(ii) employs at least one full–time qualified police officer; or
(2) (i) has expenditures for police protection that exceed $80,000; and
(ii) employs at least two part–time qualified police officers from a
county police department or county sheriff’s department.
4–503.
(a) There is a State Aid for Police Protection Fund.
4–504.
– 27 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) The Executive Director shall administer the Fund.
(b) The Executive Director shall:
(1) certify to the Comptroller, counties, and qualifying municipalities the
amount of payments under this subtitle to the counties and qualifying municipalities; and
(2) adopt regulations and require reports that are necessary to certify the
amounts.
(c) In administering the Fund, the Executive Director shall:
(1) make a continuing effort to establish standards of police protection
adequate to the various local situations; and
(2) subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, report periodically
to the General Assembly on progress in establishing and meeting those standards,
including the payment amounts certified under subsection (b) of this section and any other
relevant fiscal information.
4–510.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENT” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–104.1 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(B) IF THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR FINDS THAT A COUNTY OR QUALIFYING
MUNICIPALITY IS NOT COMPLYING WITH STATE LAW RELATED TO IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT AGREEMENTS, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL NOTIFY THE
COUNTY OR QUALIFYING MUNICIPALITY OF THE NONCOMPLIANCE.
(C) IF A COUNTY OR QUALIFYING MUNICIPALITY DISPUTES THE FINDING IN
THE NOTICE ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN 30 DAYS
AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF THE NOTICE, THE DISPUTE SHALL BE PROMPTLY
REFERRED TO THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, WHO SHALL MAKE
A FINAL DETERMINATION.
(D) ON RECEIPT OF CERTIFICATION OF NONCOMPLIANCE BY THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OR THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL SUSPEND, UNTIL NOTIFICATION OF COMPLIANCE IS
RECEIVED, PAYMENT OF:
(1) ANY FUNDS DUE THE COUNTY OR QUALIFYING MUNICIPALITY FOR
THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR UNDER § 4–506 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(2) ANY ENHANCED OR DISCRETIONARY FUNDING FOR POLICE
PROTECTION DUE THE COUNTY OR QUALIFYING MUNICIPALITY FOR THE CURRENT
FISCAL YEAR.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
5A–303.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(30) “Small commercial project” means a rehabilitation of a structure if:
(i) the qualified rehabilitation expenditures do not exceed $500,000;
and
(ii) 1. the structure is primarily used for commercial,
income–producing purposes;
2. the structure:
A. is a residential unit in a consecutive series of similar
residential units that are arranged in a row, side by side; and
B. is sold as part of a development project for exclusive
occupancy to, and occupied by, the resident;
3. the structure is a targeted project; or
4. the structure is a condominium or cooperative project and
the rehabilitation targets only the common elements of the condominium or cooperative
project.
(d) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Reserve Fund” means the Historic Revitalization Tax Credit
Reserve Fund established under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(iii) “Trust Account” means the Small Commercial Project Trust
Account established under paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(2) (i) There is a Historic Revitalization Tax Credit Reserve Fund that
is a continuing, nonlapsing special fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of this article.
(4) (i) Within the Reserve Fund, there is a Small Commercial Project
Trust Account.
– 29 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) 1. The Trust Account is established for the issuance of tax
credit certificates for small commercial projects.
(iv) 1. For each of fiscal years 2024 through [2031] 2026, the
Governor shall include in the budget bill an appropriation to the Trust Account of at least
$2,000,000.
2. FOR EACH OF FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO THE
TRUST ACCOUNT OF AT LEAST $500,000.
5A–330.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “AAHP Grant Fund” means the African American Heritage
Preservation Grant Fund of the Trust.
(3) “African American Heritage Grant” means a grant made under the
Program for an African American Heritage Preservation Project or that is an African
American Heritage Preservation Noncapital Grant.
(4) “African American Heritage Preservation Noncapital Grant” means a
grant awarded under this section for the purpose of preserving or sharing African American
history or culture in the State.
(5) “African American Heritage Preservation Project” means a capital
project that:
(i) preserves buildings, communities, and sites of historical and
cultural importance to the African American experience in the State; and
(ii) is for:
1. the acquisition of land or buildings; or
2. the construction or improvement of land or buildings.
(8) “Program” means the African American Heritage Preservation
Program.
(9) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Planning.
(b) (1) There is an African American Heritage Preservation Program in the
Trust.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(2) The purpose of the Program is to identify and preserve buildings,
communities, and sites of historical and cultural importance to the African American
experience in the State.
(c) (1) There is an African American Heritage Preservation Grant Fund in the
Trust.
(3) The AAHP Grant Fund may be used only for African American Heritage
Grants.
(5) The AAHP Grant Fund consists of:
(i) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(ii) investment earnings of the AAHP Grant Fund;
(iii) grants and donations to the AAHP Grant Fund;
(iv) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the AAHP Grant Fund; and
(v) money received from the sale of State general obligation bonds.
(6) For each fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the annual operating
or capital budget an appropriation of $5,000,000 to the AAHP Grant Fund TO BE USED
FOR AFRICAN AMERICAN HERITAGE PRESERVATION PROJECTS.
(h) (1) The Secretary shall:
(i) review each grant application submitted under subsection (d) or
(g) of this section and the recommendations of the Trust and the Commission;
(ii) consider:
1. the applications and recommendations under the criteria
set forth in subsection (f)(2) of this section; and
2. if the grant was submitted under subsection (g) of this
section, the nature of the emergency; and
(iii) subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, make the
final decision to award the grant or deny the application.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3)(ii) of this subsection, the Secretary may award
a grant under the Program funded by money received under subsection [(c)(5)(i), (ii), (iv),
– 31 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
or (v)] (C)(5)(II), (IV), OR (V) of this section only for an African American Heritage
Preservation Project.
(3) (i) The Secretary may award a grant funded by money received
under subsection (c)(5)(iii) of this section as an African American Heritage Preservation
Noncapital Grant.
(ii) If, after the award of all eligible grants under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph have been made, there is additional money in the AAHP Grant Fund
received under subsection (c)(5)(iii) of this section, the Secretary may award a grant funded
by money received under subsection (c)(5)(iii) of this section for an African American
Heritage Preservation Project.
(4) THE SECRETARY MAY AWARD A GRANT UNDER THE PROGRAM AS
AN AFRICAN AMERICAN HERITAGE PRESERVATION NONCAPITAL GRANT FROM
THE MONEY RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(5)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE
AMOUNT RECEIVED IS MORE THAN THE $5,000,000 REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(6) OF THIS SECTION.
7–115.
(a) On submission of the budget bill to the presiding officers of the General
Assembly, the Governor shall provide the supporting material specified in this section.
(b) The Governor shall [provide] PUBLISH ONLINE budget books that include the
information required in this section.
7–311.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Account” means the Revenue Stabilization Account.
(3) “Estimated General Fund revenues” means the estimated General
Fund revenues for a fiscal year stated in the report of the Board of Revenue Estimates
submitted to the Governor under § 6–106 of this article in December preceding the fiscal
year.
(4) “Unappropriated General Fund surplus” does not include the amount
of nonwithholding income tax revenues that exceed the capped estimate determined under
§ 6–104(e) of this article.
(b) (1) The Revenue Stabilization Account is established to retain State
revenues for future needs and reduce the need for future tax increases by moderating
revenue growth.
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(2) It is the goal of the State that 10% of estimated General Fund revenues
in each fiscal year be retained in the Account.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, for each fiscal year,
except fiscal [year 2026] YEARS 2026 AND 2027:
(i) if the Account balance is below 3% of the estimated General Fund
revenues for that fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the budget bill an appropriation
to the Account equal to at least $100,000,000; and
(ii) if the Account balance is at least 3% but less than 7.5% of the
estimated General Fund revenues for that fiscal year, the Governor shall include in the
budget bill an appropriation to the Account equal to at least the lesser of $50,000,000 or
whatever amount is required for the Account balance to exceed 7.5% of the estimated
General Fund revenues for that fiscal year.
(2) At the end of fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, if the
amount of nonwithholding income tax revenues exceeds the capped estimate determined
under § 6–104(e) of this article, the State Comptroller shall distribute funds as provided in
§ 7–329(c) and (d) of this subtitle.
7–317.
(a) There is a Cigarette Restitution Fund.
(g) (1) Amounts may only be expended from the Fund through appropriations
in the State budget bill as provided in this subsection.
(6) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO FISCAL YEAR 2027.
(II) For each of fiscal years 2025 through 2029, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $8,000,000 to the Maryland
Community Health Resources Commission Fund.
(h) (1) The Fund shall include a separate account consisting of payments
received by the State as a result of litigation by participating manufacturers related to the
State’s diligent enforcement of Title 16, Subtitle 4 of the Business Regulation Article.
(2) (i) Except as provided in [subparagraph (ii)] SUBPARAGRAPHS (II)
AND (III) of this paragraph, distributions from the separate account may be used only to
supplant the General Fund appropriation to the historically black colleges and universities
required under [§ 15–126] § 15–128 of the Education Article.
(ii) For fiscal year 2026 only, distributions from the separate account
may be used to support Medicaid expenses.
– 33 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, ANY AMOUNT THAT IS
DISTRIBUTED FROM THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT THAT IS IN EXCESS OF THE FIRST
$35,000,000 DISTRIBUTED MAY REMAIN IN THE ACCOUNT OR BE USED FOR
PURPOSES OTHER THAN SUPPLANTING THE GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION TO
THE HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES REQUIRED UNDER §
15–128 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(i) (1) The Fund shall include a separate account consisting of payments
received by the State from any judgment, settlement, penalty, offer of compromise, or any
other enforcement action related to the sale and marketing of electronic smoking devices.
(2) Distributions from the separate account established under paragraph
(1) of this subsection may be used, consistent with any other provision of State law, to
supplement the General Fund appropriations designated for programs under subsection (f)
of this section with the purpose of reducing the use of tobacco products by individuals under
the age of 21 years.
7–330.
(b) There is a Fiscal Responsibility Fund.
(g) (1) Except as provided in [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) of this
subsection, the Fund may be used only to provide pay–as–you–go capital funds for:
(i) public school construction and public school capital improvement
projects, in accordance with Title 5, Subtitle 3 of the Education Article;
(ii) capital projects at public community colleges; and
(iii) capital projects at four–year public institutions of higher
education.
(2) For fiscal year 2023 only, money in the Fund shall be used to provide,
beginning July 1, 2022, a cost–of–living adjustment of up to 4.5% for permanent employees
in the Executive Branch of State government who are in a bargaining unit that is
represented by the American Federation of State, County and Municipal Employees,
AFL–CIO, excluding a bargaining unit represented by the American Federation of State,
County and Municipal Employees, AFL–CIO Local 1859.
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026 ONLY, MONEY IN THE FUND MAY BE USED
FOR MAJOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, AS DEFINED IN
§ 3.5–301(K) OF THIS ARTICLE, THAT ARE FUNDED BY THE INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3.5–309 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(k) [At] EXCEPT FOR THE FISCAL YEAR 2026 APPROPRIATION DESCRIBED
IN SUBSECTION (G)(3) OF THIS SECTION, AT the end of a fiscal year, the unspent balance
of each appropriation that was made for that fiscal year from the Fund reverts to the Fund.
Article – State Government
9–120.
(b) (1) By the end of the month following collection, the Comptroller shall
deposit, cause to be deposited, or pay:
(iv) after June 30, 2021, into the Racing and Community
Development Financing Fund established under § 10–657.2 of the Economic Development
Article from the money that remains in the State Lottery Fund, after the distribution under
subsection (a) of this section[,]:
1. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO
$13,400,000; AND
2. FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, an amount
equal to at least $17,000,000 [in each fiscal year] until the bonds issued for a racing facility
have matured;
(xii) 1. after June 30, 2024, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM 2 OF
THIS ITEM, into the Prince George’s County Blue Line Corridor Facility Fund established
under § 10–657.6 of the Economic Development Article from the money that remains in the
State Lottery Fund from the proceeds of all lotteries after the distributions under subsection
(a) of this section and items (i) through (xi) of this paragraph, $27,000,000; AND
2. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027:
A. $18,000,000 FOR A GRANT TO THE MARYLAND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF A MIXED–USE
DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING A SOCCER STADIUM AT THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND,
COLLEGE PARK;
B. $4,000,000 FOR A GRANT TO THE VELOCITY
COMPANIES FOR INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
ALONG THE BLUE LINE CORRIDOR;
C. $2,000,000 FOR A GRANT TO THE ATLANTIC PACIFIC
COMPANIES TO SUPPORT THE ADDISON PARK DEVELOPMENT PROJECT;
– 35 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
D. $1,500,000 FOR A GRANT TO THE PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY TO SUPPORT ARTSPACE IN MOUNT
RAINIER;
E. $750,000 FOR A GRANT TO THE TOWN OF COLMAR
MANOR FOR THE COLMAR MANOR COMMUNITY CENTER AND TOWN HALL; AND
F. $750,000 FOR A GRANT TO THE TOWN OF COTTAGE
CITY FOR CONVERTING A FIREHOUSE INTO A COMMUNITY OUTREACH CENTER;
9–20B–02.
There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Program in the Maryland Energy
Administration.
9–20B–03.
The purpose of the Program is to decrease energy demand and increase energy
supply to promote affordable, reliable, and clean energy AND TO STRENGTHEN THE
STATE’S CLIMATE MITIGATION AND CLIMATE RESILIENCY to fuel Maryland’s future
prosperity.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(13) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs associated
with:
(I) the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of
the Environment; AND
(II) THE POWER PLANT RESEARCH PROGRAM WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, INCLUDING TO SUPPORT
ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW OF APPLICATIONS FOR CERTIFICATES OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY ASSOCIATED WITH POWER PLANT CONSTRUCTION AS
REQUIRED UNDER § 3–306 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW PROGRAM WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES, INCLUDING TO SUPPORT THE REVIEW OF
NATURAL RESOURCE IMPACTS OF PROPOSED DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS ON STATE
AND PRIVATE LANDS; and
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(3) at least 20% shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs
account for:
(i) renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
(ii) energy–related public education and outreach; [and]
(iii) climate change and resiliency programs; [and]
(IV) PROGRAMS AND APPLICABLE INITIATIVES RELATED TO
STATE CLIMATE CHANGE MITIGATION AND CLIMATE CHANGE RESILIENCY EFFORTS;
AND
(V) NOTWITHSTANDING § 9–20B–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
PROGRAMS AND APPLICABLE INITIATIVES RELATED TO RESILIENCY EFFORTS
DEFINED AND IMPLEMENTED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT, INCLUDING THE ANNUAL REPORT BY THE OFFICE OF RESILIENCE
REQUIRED UNDER § 14–1203 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(i) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs [(2), (3), and (4)] (2) THROUGH (6)
of this subsection, compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may
be used only to make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable
energy sources in the State that are owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(5) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID UNDER §§
7–705(B) AND 7–705(B)(2)(I)2 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE SHALL BE MADE
AVAILABLE FOR THE FOLLOWING:
(I) $70,000,000 TO THE MARYLAND ENERGY ADMINISTRATION
TO PROVIDE GAP FINANCING FOR AT–RISK, LARGE–SCALE CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECTS;
– 37 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) $10,000,000 TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION TO
CONDUCT RESEARCH INTO GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES AND ADVANCED
TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(III) $5,000,000 TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION FOR
GRANTS TO UTILITY COMPANIES TO CONSTRUCT OR MODIFY TRANSMISSION
FACILITIES THAT INCORPORATE GRID–ENHANCING AND ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES;
(IV) $10,000,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
TO ESTABLISH A PROCESS, ESTABLISH A MODEL LEASING FRAMEWORK, AND CREATE
SAFETY GUIDELINES FOR RIGHT–OF–WAY FOR TRANSMISSION INFRASTRUCTURE;
(V) $25,000,000 TO THE DEDICATED PURPOSE ACCOUNT FOR
RESOURCE PLANNING RELATED TO IMPLEMENTATION OF CHAPTER 19 OF THE ACTS
OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE 2025 SPECIAL SESSION; AND
(VI) $42,000,000 TO THE DEDICATED PURPOSE ACCOUNT TO BE
MADE AVAILABLE FOR HIGHER EDUCATION RESEARCH GRANTS IN ANY RESEARCH
FIELD AND NOT LIMITED TO ENERGY–RELATED RESEARCH.
(6) FOR FISCAL YEARS 2027 THROUGH 2031, COMPLIANCE FEES PAID
UNDER § 7–705 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE AND DEPOSITED INTO THE
FUND MAY BE USED FOR GRANTS OR LOANS TO SUPPORT THE CREATION OF NEW
TIER 1 RENEWABLE ENERGY SOURCES IN THE STATE.
21–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Corps participant” means an individual who participates in the Program.
(d) “Department” means the Department of Service and Civic Innovation.
(h) “Program” means the Maryland Corps Program.
21–205.
(a) (1) There is a Young Adult Service Year Option Pathway in the Program.
(c) (1) The Department shall set targets for participation in the YA Pathway
under this section, including:
(i) 200 corps participants in the first year of implementation;
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(ii) 750 corps participants in the third year of implementation;
(iii) [1,500] 1,100 corps participants in the fourth year of
implementation; [and]
(iv) [2,000] 1,550 corps participants in the fifth year of
implementation; AND
(V) 2,000 CORPS PARTICIPANTS IN THE SIXTH YEAR OF
IMPLEMENTATION.
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
21–304.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) With respect to local employees, “aggregate annual earnable
compensation” means the total annual earnable compensation payable by a local employer
to all of its local employees, calculated as of June 30 of the second prior fiscal year before
the fiscal year for which the calculation is made under this section, adjusted by any
actuarial assumed salary increases that were used in the actuarial valuation prepared
under § 21–125(b) of this title for the immediate prior fiscal year.
(3) “Local employee” means a member of the Teachers’ Retirement System
or the Teachers’ Pension System who is an employee of a day school in the State under the
authority and supervision of a county board of education or the Baltimore City Board of
School Commissioners, employed as:
(i) a clerk;
(ii) a helping teacher;
(iii) a principal;
(iv) a superintendent;
(v) a supervisor; or
(vi) a teacher.
(4) “Local employer” means a county board of education or the Baltimore
City Board of School Commissioners.
– 39 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) “State member” does not include a member on whose behalf a
participating governmental unit is required to make an employer contribution under §
21–305 or § 21–306 of this subtitle.
(6) “Total employer contribution for local employees” means that portion of
the employer contribution calculated under subsection (b) of this section that is attributable
to all local employees.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection, each fiscal year, on
behalf of the State members of each State system, the State shall pay to the appropriate
accumulation fund an amount equal to or greater than the sum of the amount, if any,
required to be included in the budget bill under § 3–501(c)(2)(ii) of this article and the
product of multiplying:
(i) the aggregate annual earnable compensation of the State
members of that State system; and
(ii) the sum of the normal contribution rate and the accrued liability
contribution rate for State members of that State system, as determined under this section.
(4) (i) Subject to § 21–309.1 of this subtitle, beginning on July 1, 2012,
and each fiscal year thereafter, each local employer shall pay to the appropriate
accumulation fund an amount equal to the local share of the total employer contribution
for local employees as provided in this paragraph.
(iii) Beginning in fiscal year 2017, each local employer shall pay to
the Board of Trustees its local share equal to the normal contribution rate for the Teachers’
Retirement System and the Teachers’ Pension System multiplied by the aggregate annual
earnable compensation of the local employees of that local employer.
(5) Except as provided in paragraph (6) of this subsection, the difference
between the total employer contribution for local employees and the local share of the total
employer contribution for all local employees shall be the obligation of the State.
(6) (i) Subject to § 21–309.2 of this subtitle and as provided under
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, beginning in fiscal year [2026] 2027, each county
government shall pay to the Board of Trustees the following amounts:
County
Government
Allegany ...................................... [754,195] 1,139,988
Anne Arundel.............................. [9,738,875] 13,344,016
Baltimore City ............................ [8,802,114] 12,041,167
Baltimore .................................... [10,352,112] 15,122,563
Calvert ........................................ [1,647,480] 2,284,705
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
Caroline ....................................... [561,645] 785,750
Carroll ......................................... [2,624,055] 3,661,920
Cecil............................................. [1,327,122] 1,963,691
Charles ........................................ [2,786,366] 3,900,924
Dorchester ................................... [590,506] 794,625
Frederick ..................................... [5,925,608] 7,899,429
Garrett ........................................ [269,208] 428,865
Harford ........................................ [3,685,077] 5,297,751
Howard ........................................ [6,830,167] 9,696,329
Kent ............................................. [165,489] 255,179
Montgomery ................................ [20,861,475] 28,754,528
Prince George’s ........................... [13,000,062] 18,675,337
Queen Anne’s .............................. [691,279] 973,835
St. Mary’s .................................... [1,562,014] 2,205,319
Somerset ..................................... [314,066] 442,575
Talbot .......................................... [452,957] 651,179
Washington ................................. [2,397,889] 3,279,909
Wicomico ..................................... [1,704,888] 2,379,362
Worcester .................................... [699,872] 1,049,543
(ii) 1. For fiscal year 2026, each county government shall pay to
the Board of Trustees on or before January 1, 2026, the amount required under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
2. Beginning in fiscal year 2027, each county government
shall pay to the Board of Trustees on or before each September 1 the amount required under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iii) Each fiscal year, the amounts paid under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall reduce the obligations of the State with respect to the Teachers’ Pension
System and the Teachers’ Retirement System by the same amounts.
Article – Tax – General
2–606.
(b) (1) In June of each year, from current collections, the Comptroller shall
reserve an amount of unallocated revenue that the Comptroller estimates will be claimed
on returns and refunded to taxpayers within 3 years of the date the income tax return was
due to be filed, and distribute to each county, municipal corporation, and special taxing
district a pro rata share of the balance of the unallocated individual income tax revenue.
(2) The Comptroller shall adjust the amount distributed under paragraph
(1) of this subsection to a county, municipal corporation, or special taxing district to allow
for the proportionate part of tax claim payments for a prior calendar year made after a
– 41 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
distribution is made to the county, municipal corporation, or special taxing district for that
year.
(i) (1) On or before [July 31, 2025] JUNE 1, 2025 2026, the Comptroller shall
distribute $37,300,000 from the Local Reserve Account established to comply with this
section to the [Division of Paid Leave within the Maryland Department of Labor]
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(2) The Maryland Department of Labor shall reimburse the Local Reserve
Account $37,300,000 within 2 years after contributions into the Department’s Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund begin.
Article – Tax – Property
13–209.
(a) (1) Before any other distribution under this section, in any fiscal year that
bonds secured by a pledge of the State transfer tax are outstanding, the revenue from the
transfer tax shall be used to pay, as and when due, the principal of and interest on the
bonds.
(2) The Department shall deduct the cost of administering the transfer tax
from the taxes collected under this title and credit those revenues to the fund established
under § 1–203.3 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, after deducting
the revenues required under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the revenue from
transfer tax is payable to the Comptroller for deposit in a special fund.
(4) In any fiscal year in which transfer tax revenue is used to pay debt
service on outstanding bonds under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the distribution of
revenues in the special fund under this section and as specified in § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the
Natural Resources Article, for State land acquisition, or to the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund to the extent any debt service is attributable to that Fund, shall be
reduced by an amount equal to the debt service for the fiscal year.
(b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002 and for subsequent fiscal years, up
to 3% of the revenues in the special fund may be appropriated in the State budget for
salaries and related expenses in the Departments of General Services and Natural
Resources and in the Department of Planning necessary to administer Title 5, Subtitle 9 of
the Natural Resources Article (Program Open Space).
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, of the balance of the revenue in
the special fund, not required under subsection (b) of this section:
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(i) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, $47,268,585 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in subsection (d) of this section;
(ii) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, $102,833,869 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in the State budget;
(iii) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, $147,374,444 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State, and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in the State budget; and
(iv) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, $68,223,132 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for the fiscal years beginning
July 1, 2006 and each subsequent fiscal year, the balance of the revenue in the special fund,
not required under subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated as provided in subsection
(d) of this section.
(3) (i) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for fiscal years 2026
through 2029, of the balance of the revenue in the special fund not required under
subsection (b) of this section, $25,000,000 shall be allocated to the General Fund of the
State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided in PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND subsection (d) of this section.
(ii) For each of fiscal years 2026 through 2029, the allocation
required under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall reduce the amount allocated for
Program Open Space land acquisition purposes identified in subsection (d)(1)(ii) of this
section and § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the Natural Resources Article, the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund identified in subsection (d)(2) of this section, and the Rural Legacy
Program identified in subsection (d)(3) of this section and § 5–903(a)(2)(iii) of the Natural
Resources Article by an amount that is proportional to the amount of revenue each program
is estimated to receive for the fiscal year.
(4) (I) IN ADDITION TO THE GENERAL FUND ALLOCATION UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 ONLY, OF THE BALANCE OF THE REVENUE IN THE
SPECIAL FUND NOT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION,
$71,743,156 SHALL BE ALLOCATED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE AND THE
REMAINDER SHALL BE ALLOCATED AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
– 43 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL REDUCE THE AMOUNT ALLOCATED FOR THE FOLLOWING
PROGRAMS AND FUNDS:
1. PROGRAM OPEN SPACE (LOCAL) FUNDS IDENTIFIED
IN §§ 5–903(A)(2)(II)2E AND (B)(1) AND 5–905(B)(7) OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE BY $49,586,156;
2. RURAL LEGACY PROGRAM FUNDS IDENTIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (D)(3) OF THIS SECTION AND § 9–503(A)(2)(III) OF THE NATURAL
RESOURCES ARTICLE BY $13,400,000; AND
3. FUNDS FOR THE NATURAL RESOURCES
DEVELOPMENT FUND IDENTIFIED FOR THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN § 5–903(G)(1)
OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(III) THE ALLOCATIONS REDUCED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II)
OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE REPLACED WITH GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS.
(d) Subject to subsections (d–1) and (e) of this section, for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2002 and for each subsequent fiscal year, the balance of the revenue in the special
fund, not required under subsection (b) of this section and not allocated to the General Fund
under subsection (c)(1) [and], (3), AND (4) of this section shall be allocated in the State
budget as follows:
(1) (i) 75.15% for the purposes specified in Title 5, Subtitle 9 of the
Natural Resources Article (Program Open Space); and
(ii) an additional 1% for Program Open Space, for land acquisition
purposes as specified in § 5–903(a)(2) of the Natural Resources Article;
(2) 17.05% for the Agricultural Land Preservation Fund established under
§ 2–505 of the Agriculture Article;
(3) 5% for the Rural Legacy Program established under § 5–9A–01 of the
Natural Resources Article; and
(4) 1.8% for the Heritage Conservation Fund established under § 5–1501
of the Natural Resources Article.
(e) The sums allocated in subsection (d) of this section may not revert to the
General Fund of the State.
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(g) (3) (i) 1. For fiscal year 2023, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill a General Fund appropriation in the amount of $2,500,000 to the
Maryland Agricultural and Resource–Based Industry Development Corporation for the
Next Generation Farmland Acquisition Program authorized under § 10–523(a)(3)(ii) of the
Economic Development Article.
2. For fiscal year 2025 only, the Governor shall include in the
annual budget bill a General Fund appropriation in the amount of $2,735,000 to the
Maryland Agricultural and Resource–Based Industry Development Corporation
established under Title 10, Subtitle 5 of the Economic Development Article to be used as
follows:
A. $2,300,000 to support the Corporation’s rural business
loan programs and small matching grant programs; and
B. $435,000 for grants and near–equity investments to:
I. support the creation or expansion of agricultural product
aggregation and storage sites; and
II. facilitate participation in the Certified Local Farm and
Fish Program.
3. A. For each of fiscal years 2024, 2025, AND 2026, [and
2027,] the Governor shall include in the annual budget bill a General Fund appropriation
of $500,000 to the Urban Agriculture Water and Power Infrastructure Grant Fund
established under § 2–2103 of the Agriculture Article.
B. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE GOVERNOR SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL A GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATION OF
$400,000 TO THE URBAN AGRICULTURE WATER AND POWER INFRASTRUCTURE
GRANT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 2–2103 OF THE AGRICULTURE ARTICLE.
(ii) The appropriations required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph:
1. are not subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c),
and (f) of this section;
2. shall be allocated as provided in subsection (d) of this
section and § 5–903 of the Natural Resources Article; and
3. shall be reduced by the amount of any appropriation from
the General Fund to the special fund that:
– 45 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
A. exceeds the required appropriation under this paragraph;
and
B. is identified as an appropriation for reimbursement under
this paragraph.
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if an
appropriation or a transfer from the special fund to the General Fund occurs after the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2018, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bills for each
of the 3 successive fiscal years following the fiscal year in which a transfer is made a
General Fund appropriation to the special fund equal to one–third of the cumulative
amount of the appropriation or transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the
applicable fiscal year.
(2) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) represents reimbursement for the cumulative amount of any
appropriation or transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the applicable fiscal
year;
(ii) is not subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c), and (f)
of this section;
(iii) shall be allocated as provided in subsection (d) of this section and
§ 5–903 of the Natural Resources Article;
(iv) shall be made until the cumulative total appropriated under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is equal to the cumulative amount of any appropriation or
transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the applicable fiscal year; and
(v) shall be reduced by the amount of any appropriation from the
General Fund to the special fund that:
1. exceeds the required appropriation under this subsection;
and
2. is identified as an appropriation for reimbursement under
this subsection.
(3) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection does
not apply to transfers from the special fund to the General Fund that occur in fiscal years
2026 through 2029.
Article – Transportation
13–955.
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Emergency Medical System
Operations Fund.
(e) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, the money in the Fund
shall be used solely for:
(1) Medically oriented functions of the Department of State Police, Special
Operations Bureau, Aviation Division;
(2) The Maryland Institute for Emergency Medical Services Systems;
(3) The R Adams Cowley Shock Trauma Center at the University of
Maryland Medical System;
(4) The Maryland Fire and Rescue Institute;
(5) The provision of grants under the Senator William H. Amoss Fire,
Rescue, and Ambulance Fund in accordance with the provisions of Title 8, Subtitle 1 of the
Public Safety Article; and
(6) The Volunteer Company Assistance Fund in accordance with the
provisions of Title 8, Subtitle 2 of the Public Safety Article.
(f) For fiscal years 2025 [and 2026] THROUGH 2029, the money in the Fund may
be used to support general operations of the Department of State Police, Special Operations
Bureau, Aviation Command.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
7–414.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Fund” means the Driver Education in Public High Schools Fund.
(3) “Program” means the Driver Education in Public High Schools Grant
Program.
(b) There is a Driver Education in Public High Schools Grant Program in the
Department.
(f) (1) There is a Driver Education in Public High Schools Fund.
– 47 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) The Fund consists of[:
(i) Money received by the Fund from fines for vehicle security lapses
under § 17–106 of the Transportation Article; and
(ii) Any other] money from any [other] source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(5) The Fund may be used only for:
(i) Providing grants under the Program; and
(ii) Administrative costs of the Program.
Article – Natural Resources
5–903.
(a) (1) (i) Of the funds distributed to Program Open Space under § 13–209
of the Tax – Property Article, up to $3,000,000 may be transferred by an appropriation in
the State budget, or by an amendment to the State budget under Title 7, Subtitle 2 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article, to the Maryland Heritage Areas Authority
Financing Fund established under Title 13, Subtitle 11 of the Financial Institutions Article
to be used for the purposes provided in that subtitle.
(ii) Of the amount transferred under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, up to $300,000 may be distributed to the Maryland Historical Trust within the
Department of Planning to be awarded as noncapital historic preservation grants.
(2) (i) 1. Of the remaining funds not appropriated under paragraph
(1)(i) of this subsection:
A. One half of the funds shall be used for recreation and open
space purposes by the Department and the Historic St. Mary’s City Commission; [and]
B. 20% of the funds or $21,000,000, whichever is greater,
shall be appropriated to the Forest and Park Service in the Department to operate State
forests and parks; AND
C. 0.2% OF THE FUNDS OR $200,000, WHICHEVER IS
GREATER, SHALL BE APPROPRIATED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING TO
OPERATE AND MAINTAIN THE JEFFERSON PATTERSON PARK AND MUSEUM.
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
2. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any funds the
General Assembly appropriates to the State under this subsection shall be used only for
land acquisition projects.
(i) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or the allocation
formulas in § 13–209 of the Tax – Property Article and subject to paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the Governor may transfer to the Department funds from the Program Open
Space State land acquisition balance if:
(i) The balance is more than $80,000,000 at the end of a given fiscal
year; and
(ii) The Department’s existing special fund sources are insufficient
to cover existing salaries for permanent, classified positions responsible for operating and
maintaining lands administered and managed by the Department.
(2) After a fund transfer under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
remaining balance must be at least $80,000,000.
(3) (i) The Department may use any amount of the transferred funds
as a one–time fiscal year expenditure for:
1. Operation and maintenance of lands administered and
managed by the Department;
2. Administrative expenses related to land acquired by the
Department under Program Open Space; or
3. Law enforcement activities, services, salaries, and related
expenses of the Natural Resources Police.
(ii) The Department may transfer any amount of the transferred
funds to the Forest or Park Reserve Fund established under § 5–212 of this title.
(4) Any fund transfer made under this subsection supplements rather than
supplants any other funding for operation, maintenance, and administration of lands
administered and managed by the Department regardless of the source of the other
funding.
(5) FOR PURPOSES OF THE FUND TRANSFER ALLOWED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BALANCE OF THE HERITAGE CONSERVATION FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–1501 OF THIS TITLE AND ANY OTHER FUNDS
APPROPRIATED TO PROGRAM OPEN SPACE (STATESIDE) SHALL BE INCLUDED AS
PART OF THE PROGRAM OPEN SPACE STATE LAND ACQUISITION BALANCE.
Article – Transportation
– 49 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
17–106.
(a) If the required security for any vehicle lapses at any time, the registration of
that vehicle:
(1) Is suspended automatically as of the date of the lapse effective not later
than 60 days after notification to the Administration that the lapse has occurred; and
(2) Remains suspended until:
(i) The required security is replaced and the vehicle owner submits
evidence of replaced security on a form as prescribed by the Administration and certified
by an insurer or insurance producer; and
(ii) Any uninsured motorist penalty fee assessed is paid to the
Administration.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each insurer or
other provider of required security immediately shall notify the Administration
electronically of those terminations or other lapses that are final.
(2) Each insurer or other provider of required security for a vehicle
registered as a Class B (for hire) vehicle under Title 13 of this article shall notify the
Administration within 45 days after a termination or other lapse that is final and occurs
anytime after the required security is issued or provided.
(c) On receipt of a notice under subsection (b) of this section, the Administration
shall:
(1) Make a reasonable effort to notify the owner of the vehicle that his
registration has been suspended; and
(2) Provide electronically the information contained in the notice of the
suspension to the Uninsured Division of the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund.
(d) (1) Within 48 hours after an owner is notified by the Administration of the
suspension of registration, the owner shall surrender all evidences of that registration to
the Administration.
(2) If the owner fails to surrender the evidences of registration within the
48–hour period, the Administration:
(i) Shall attempt to recover from the owner the evidences of
registration; and
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(ii) May suspend his license to drive until he returns to the Motor
Vehicle Administration the evidences of registration.
(3) The Administration may enter into contracts with private parties to
procure the services of independent agents to assist in the recovery of the evidences of
registration as authorized in paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(e) (1) (i) 1. Except as provided in subparagraphs (iv) and (v) of this
paragraph, in addition to any other penalty provided for in the Maryland Vehicle Law, if
the required security for a vehicle terminates or otherwise lapses during its registration
year, the Administration may assess the owner of the vehicle with a penalty of $200 for
each vehicle without the required security for a period of 1 to 30 days.
2. If a fine is assessed, beginning on the 31st day the fine
shall increase by a rate of $7 for each day.
(ii) Each period during which the required security for a vehicle
terminates or otherwise lapses shall constitute a separate violation.
(iii) The penalty imposed under this subsection may not exceed
$3,500 for each violation in a 12–month period.
(iv) The Administration may not assess a penalty under this
subsection if:
1. The registration plates of the vehicle are returned to the
Administration within 10 days after the termination or lapse of the required security, as
shown by the records of the Administration; and
2. A. The certificate of title for the vehicle has been
transferred to a new owner;
B. The registered owner has moved out–of–state and the
registration plates are returned by mail;
C. A salvage certificate has been issued for the vehicle; or
D. A licensed dealer has taken possession of the vehicle with
an obligation to return the registration plates.
(v) Before the Administration may assess a penalty under this
subsection, the Administration shall first verify that the registration plates for the vehicle
were not returned to the Administration within 10 days after the termination or lapse of
the required security.
– 51 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (i) Except as provided under paragraph (3) of this subsection, a
penalty assessed under this subsection shall be paid as follows:
1. 70% to be allocated as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph; and
2. 30% to the Administration, which may be used by the
Administration, subject to subsection (f) of this section, to provide funding for contracts
with independent agents to assist in the recovery of evidences of registration as authorized
in subsection (d)(3) of this section.
(ii) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2014, the
percentage of the penalties specified under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph shall be
allocated among the Safe Schools Fund, the Vehicle Theft Prevention Fund, the Maryland
Automobile Insurance Fund, [the Driver Education in Public High Schools Fund,] the
State–Aided Institutions Field Trip Fund, and the General Fund as follows:
1. $600,000 to the Safe Schools Fund;
2. $2,000,000 to the Vehicle Theft Prevention Fund;
3. The amounts specified under subparagraph (iii) of this
paragraph to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund;
4. [$2,000,000 to the Driver Education in Public High
Schools Fund;
5.] $600,000 to the State–Aided Institutions Field Trip Fund;
and
[6.] 5. The balance to the General Fund.
(iii) 1. Except for fiscal year 2024 and except as provided under
subsubparagraph 3 of this subparagraph, the amount distributed to the Maryland
Automobile Insurance Fund under subparagraph (ii)3 of this paragraph shall equal the
amount distributed to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund in the prior fiscal year
under the provisions of this paragraph adjusted by the change for the calendar year
preceding the fiscal year in the Consumer Price Index – All Urban Consumers – Medical
Care as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
2. For fiscal year 2024, the amount distributed to the
Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund under subparagraph (ii)3 of this paragraph shall
equal the amount distributed to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund in the prior
fiscal year under the provisions of this paragraph adjusted by the change for the calendar
year preceding the fiscal year in the Consumer Price Index – All Urban Consumers –
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
Medical Care as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics plus an
additional $2,000,000.
3. For fiscal year 2025, the amount distributed to the
Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund under subparagraph (ii)3 of this paragraph shall
equal the amount distributed to the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund calculated in
accordance with subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph:
A. Plus an additional $3,000,000 dedicated to the exclusive
use of the Uninsured Division, which shall become part of the base amount used to calculate
the amount distributed under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph in subsequent fiscal
years; but
B. Excluding the $2,000,000 distributed to the Fund in fiscal
year 2024.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–210.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Depreciation” includes any deduction allowed under § 179 of the
Internal Revenue Code.
(3) “Heavy duty SUV” means a 4–wheeled vehicle that:
(i) is manufactured primarily for use on public streets, roads, and
highways;
(ii) is rated at more than 6,000 but not more than 14,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight; and
(iii) would be a passenger automobile as defined in § 280F of the
Internal Revenue Code if it were rated at 6,000 pounds gross vehicle weight or less.
(4) (i) “Manufacturing entity” means a person conducting or operating
a trade or business that is primarily engaged in activities that, in accordance with the
North American Industrial Classification System (NAICS), United States Manual, United
States Office of Management and Budget, 2012 Edition, would be included in Sector 31, 32,
or 33.
– 53 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) “Manufacturing entity” does not include a refiner, as defined in
§ 10–101 of the Business Regulation Article.
(b) In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–204 through 10–210 of this
subtitle, to determine Maryland adjusted gross income of an individual:
(1) (i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, an amount is added to
or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to reflect the determination of the
depreciation deduction provided under § 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and the
adjusted basis of property without regard to the additional allowance under § 168(k) of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
[(ii) item (i) of this item does not apply to property placed in service
by a manufacturing entity on or after January 1, 2019;]
(II) FOR A MANUFACTURING ENTITY, AN AMOUNT IS ADDED TO
OR SUBTRACTED FROM FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME TO REFLECT THE
DETERMINATION OF THE DEPRECIATION DEDUCTION PROVIDED UNDER § 167(A) OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AND THE ADJUSTED BASIS OF PROPERTY BY
LIMITING THE ADDITIONAL ALLOWANCE UNDER § 168(K) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE TO 20% OF THE ADJUSTED BASIS OF THE QUALIFIED PROPERTY;
(2) AN AMOUNT IS ADDED TO OR SUBTRACTED FROM FEDERAL
ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME TO REFLECT THE DETERMINATION OF THE
DEPRECIATION DEDUCTION PROVIDED UNDER § 167(A) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE AND THE ADJUSTED BASIS OF PROPERTY WITHOUT REGARD TO THE
ADDITIONAL ALLOWANCE UNDER § 168(N) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(3) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
to determine the net operating loss deduction allowed under § 172 of the Internal Revenue
Code without regard to an election under § 172(b)(1)(H) of the Internal Revenue Code for a
carryback period of up to 5 years;
[(3)] (4) (i) except as provided in item (ii) of this item, an amount is
added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income to reflect the determination of
the maximum aggregate costs that the taxpayer may treat as an expense under § 179 of
the Internal Revenue Code for any taxable year without regard to any changes made to
that section after December 31, 2002:
1. increasing above $25,000 the dollar limitation set forth in
§ 179(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
2. increasing above $200,000 the phase–out threshold set
forth in § 179(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
– 54 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(ii) item (i) of this item does not apply to property that is placed in
service by a manufacturing entity on or after January 1, 2019;
[(4)] (5) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross
income to reflect the recognition of income from discharge of indebtedness and the
allowance of any deduction with respect to original issue discount without regard to § 108(i)
of the Internal Revenue Code; and
[(5)] (6) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross
income to reflect the determination of the depreciation deduction with respect to any heavy
duty SUV as if the heavy duty SUV were subject to the limitations of § 280F of the Internal
Revenue Code in the same manner as it would be if the vehicle were rated at 6,000 pounds
gross vehicle weight or less.
10–740.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Commission” means the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
(3) “Qualified taxpayer” means an individual who has:
(i) incurred at least $20,000 in undergraduate or graduate student
loan debt or both; and
(ii) has at least $5,000 in outstanding undergraduate or graduate
student loan debt or both when submitting an application under subsection (c) of this
section.
(b) Subject to the limitations of this section, a qualified taxpayer may claim a
credit against the State income tax for the taxable year in which the Commission certifies
a tax credit under this section.
(c) (1) (i) By September 15 of each year, an individual shall submit an
application to the Commission for the credit allowed under this section.
(ii) The individual shall submit with the application an assurance
that the individual will use any credit approved under this section for the repayment of the
individual’s undergraduate or graduate student loan debt or both as soon as practicable.
(iii) 1. The total amount of the credit claimed under this section
shall be recaptured if the individual does not use the credit approved under this section for
the repayment of the individual’s undergraduate or graduate student loan debt or both
within 3 years from the close of the taxable year for which the credit is claimed.
– 55 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. The individual who claimed the credit shall pay the total
amount of the credit claimed as taxes payable to the State for the taxable year in which the
event requiring recapture of the credit occurs.
(2) By December 15 of each year the Commission shall certify to the
individual the amount of any tax credit approved by the Commission under this section,
not to exceed $5,000.
(3) (i) For tax year 2025, the total amount of tax credits approved by
the Commission under this section may not exceed [$9,000,000] $16,000,000.
(II) FOR TAX YEAR 2026, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TAX CREDITS
APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT EXCEED
$9,000,000.
[(ii)] (III) For any taxable year after [2025] 2026, the total amount
of tax credits approved by the Commission under this section may not exceed $18,000,000.
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
Commission shall reserve $9,000,000 of the tax credits authorized under paragraph (3) of
this subsection for the following individuals in the following order of priority:
1. State employees who graduated from institutions of
higher education in the State where at least 40% of the attendees are eligible to receive
federal Pell Grants; and
2. all other State employees not described under item 1 of
this subparagraph.
(ii) If the total amount of tax credits applied for by individuals
described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph is less than $9,000,000 for a taxable
year, the Commission may make available the unused amount of credits for use by other
qualified taxpayers.
(5) To claim the tax credit allowed under this section, an individual shall
attach a copy of the Commission’s certification of the approved credit amount to the income
tax return.
(g) (1) On or before January 1 each year, the Commission shall report to the
Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly on:
(i) the number of applicants for the tax credit authorized under this
section;
– 56 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(ii) the number and amounts of tax credits awarded under this
section to qualified taxpayers;
(iii) a breakdown of the age, gender, race, income, and counties of
residency of qualified taxpayers who receive the credit; and
(iv) any additional information that the Commission deems relevant.
(2) On or before [January] DECEMBER 1, 2026, the Commission shall
report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
the General Assembly recommendations for changes to statute or regulations that would
better target the allocation of tax credits under this program.
(i) The tax credit under this section shall be referred to as the Student Loan Debt
Relief Tax Credit.
10–741.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Business entity” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the Economic
Development Article.
(3) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
(4) “Eligible project” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the Economic
Development Article.
(5) “Existing business entity” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the
Economic Development Article.
(6) “New business entity” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the Economic
Development Article.
(7) “Qualified business entity” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the
Economic Development Article.
(8) “Qualified position” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the Economic
Development Article.
(9) “Tier I area” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the Economic
Development Article.
(10) “Tier II area” has the meaning stated in § 6–801 of the Economic
Development Article.
– 57 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Subject to the limitations of this section, an individual or corporation
that is a new business entity that operates an eligible project in a Tier I area or an existing
business entity that operates an eligible project may claim a credit against the State income
tax equal to the amount stated in the final tax credit certificate approved by the Department
for an eligible project.
(2) The amount of the credit authorized under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is equal to the product of:
(i) 1. if the qualified business entity received a certificate under
§ 6–805 of the Economic Development Article before June 1, 2022, 5.75%; or
2. if the qualified business entity received a certificate under
§ 6–805 of the Economic Development Article on or after June 1, 2022, 4.75%; and
(ii) the total amount of wages paid for each qualified position at an
eligible project.
(3) If the tax credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds
the total tax otherwise payable by the qualified business entity for that taxable year, the
qualified business entity may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.
(c) (1) On enrollment in the More Jobs for Marylanders Program established
under Title 6, Subtitle 8 of the Economic Development Article, a qualified business entity
shall apply to the Department for a tax credit certificate.
(2) The application shall be in the form and shall contain the information
the Department requires.
(3) (i) Subject to subsections (d) and (e) of this section, the Department
may issue a tax credit certificate to a qualified business entity in an amount not to exceed
the amount determined under subsection (b)(2) of this section.
(ii) In determining the allocation of the aggregate tax credit amounts
available in a fiscal year as provided under subsection (d) of this section, the Department
shall give priority to applications for eligible projects in a Tier I area, as defined under §
6–801 of the Economic Development Article.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “Reserve Fund” means the More Jobs for Marylanders
Tax Credit Reserve Fund established under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(2) (i) There is a More Jobs for Marylanders Tax Credit Reserve Fund
that is a special continuing, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of the State
Finance and Procurement Article.
– 58 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(ii) The money in the Reserve Fund shall be invested and reinvested
by the Treasurer, and interest and earnings shall be credited to the General Fund.
(3) (i) Subject to the limitations of this subsection, the Department shall
issue an initial tax credit certificate in an amount equal to a percentage of total wages paid
for each qualified position at an eligible project as calculated under subsection (b)(2) of this
section.
(ii) An initial tax credit certificate issued under this subsection shall
state the maximum amount of tax credit for which the qualified business entity is eligible.
(iii) 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, for any
fiscal year, the Department may not issue initial tax credit certificates for credit amounts in
the aggregate totaling more than:
A. with respect to qualified business entities provided a
certificate under § 6–805 of the Economic Development Article before June 1, 2022,
$9,000,000 in a fiscal year; and
B. with respect to qualified business entities provided a
certificate under § 6–805 of the Economic Development Article on or after June 1, 2022,
$5,000,000 in a fiscal year.
2. If the aggregate credit amounts under initial tax credit
certificates issued in a fiscal year total less than the maximum provided under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, any excess amount shall remain in the Reserve
Fund.
3. For any fiscal year, if funds are transferred from the
Reserve Fund under the authority of any provision of law other than under paragraph (4) of
this subsection, the maximum credit amounts in the aggregate for which the Department
may issue initial tax credit certificates shall be reduced by the amount transferred.
(iv) For fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor
shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation to the Reserve Fund in an amount
that is no less than the amount the Department reports is necessary under subsection (e) of
this section to:
1. maintain the current level of manufacturing activity in the
State;
2. attract new manufacturing activity to the State; and
3. attract new businesses to and encourage the expansion of
existing businesses within opportunity zones in the State.
– 59 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(v) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 7–213 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article, the Governor may not reduce an appropriation to the Reserve Fund
in the State budget as approved by the General Assembly.
(vi) 1. [Based] SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPHS 2 AND 3 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, BASED on an amount equal to a percentage of the total actual wages
paid for each qualified position at an eligible project as calculated under subsection (b)(2) of
this section, the Department shall issue a final tax credit certificate to the qualified business
entity.
2. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF FINAL
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT EXCEED
$15,000,000.
3. IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF FINAL TAX CREDIT
CERTIFICATES THE DEPARTMENT IS REQUIRED TO ISSUE UNDER THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH EXCEEDS $15,000,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL ISSUE FINAL TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATES TO QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITIES
ON A PRO RATA BASIS.
(4) (i) Except as provided in this paragraph, money appropriated to the
Reserve Fund shall remain in the Fund.
(ii) 1. Within 15 days after the end of each calendar quarter, the
Department shall notify the Comptroller as to each final credit certificate issued during the
quarter:
A. the maximum credit amount stated in the initial tax credit
certificate for the qualified business entity; and
B. the final certified credit amount for the qualified business
entity.
2. On notification that a final credit amount has been
certified, the Comptroller shall transfer FROM THE RESERVE FUND TO THE GENERAL
FUND:
A. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027, an amount equal to the credit
amount stated in the [initial] FINAL tax credit certificate for the qualified business entity
[from the Reserve Fund to the General Fund]; AND
B. FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER, AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE CREDIT AMOUNT STATED IN THE INITIAL
TAX CREDIT CERTIFICATE FOR THE QUALIFIED BUSINESS ENTITY.
– 60 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(e) On or before July 1 each year, the Department shall report to the Governor and,
subject to § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on the amount of
tax credits necessary to:
(1) maintain the current level of manufacturing activity in the State;
(2) attract new manufacturing activity to the State; and
(3) attract new businesses to and encourage the expansion of existing
businesses within opportunity zones in the State.
(f) The Department and the Comptroller jointly shall adopt regulations to carry
out the provisions of this section and to specify criteria and procedures for the application
for, approval of, and monitoring of continuing eligibility for the tax credit under this section.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 275 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health [shall] MAY apply to the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services
Administration at the Center for Mental Health Services for inclusion in the state certified
community behavioral health clinic demonstration program for fiscal year [2026] 2029,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE BUDGET.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–102.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Pass–through entity’s taxable income” means the portion of a
pass–through entity’s income under the federal Internal Revenue Code, calculated without
regard to any deduction for taxes based on net income that are imposed by any state or
political subdivision of a state, that is:
(i) in the case of a member who is a resident[,]:
1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER ITEM 2 OF THIS ITEM,
equal to the member’s distributive or pro rata shares of the pass–through entity; or
– 61 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. ON ELECTION BY A PASS–THROUGH ENTITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D)(4) OF THIS SECTION, DERIVED FROM OR
REASONABLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE TRADE OR BUSINESS OF THE PASS–THROUGH
ENTITY IN THE STATE; OR
(ii) in the [cases] CASE of a nonresident member, derived from or
reasonably attributable to the trade or business of the pass–through entity in this State.
(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, in addition to any other tax
imposed under this title, a tax is imposed on each pass–through entity.
(2) Each pass–through entity:
(i) shall pay the tax imposed under paragraph (1) of this subsection
with respect to the distributive shares or pro rata shares of the nonresident and nonresident
entity members of the pass–through entity; or
(ii) may elect to pay the tax imposed under paragraph (1) of this
subsection with respect to the distributive shares or pro rata shares of all members of the
pass–through entity.
(d) (1) With respect to a pass–through entity that pays the tax imposed under
subsection (b)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (b)(2)(i) of this section, the tax
imposed is the sum of:
(i) a rate equal to the sum of the rate of the tax imposed under §
10–106.1 of this subtitle and the top marginal State tax rate for individuals under §
10–105(a) of this subtitle applied to the sum of each nonresident individual member’s
distributive share or pro rata share of the pass–through entity’s nonresident taxable income;
and
(ii) the rate of the tax for a corporation under § 10–105(b) of this
subtitle applied to the sum of each nonresident entity member’s distributive share or pro rata
share of the pass–through entity’s nonresident taxable income.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PASS–THROUGH ENTITY THAT PAYS THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)
OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL CALCULATE PASS–THROUGH ENTITY TAXABLE INCOME FOR RESIDENT
MEMBERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(8)(I)1 OF THIS SECTION.
(3) With respect to a pass–through entity that pays the tax imposed under
subsection (b)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (b)(2)(ii) of this section AND
CALCULATES PASS–THROUGH ENTITY TAXABLE INCOME FOR RESIDENT MEMBERS IN
– 62 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(8)(I)1 OF THIS SECTION, the tax imposed is the
sum of:
(i) a rate equal to the sum of the rate of the tax imposed under §
10–106.1 of this subtitle and the top marginal State tax rate for individuals under §
10–105(a) of this subtitle applied to the sum of each individual member’s distributive share
or pro rata share of the pass–through entity’s taxable income; and
(ii) the rate of the tax for a corporation under § 10–105(b) of this
subtitle applied to the sum of each entity member’s distributive share or pro rata share of
the pass–through entity’s taxable income.
(4) A PASS–THROUGH ENTITY THAT PAYS THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II)
OF THIS SECTION MAY ELECT TO CALCULATE PASS–THROUGH ENTITY TAXABLE
INCOME FOR RESIDENT MEMBERS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(8)(I)2 OF
THIS SECTION.
(5) WITH RESPECT TO A PASS–THROUGH ENTITY THAT PAYS THE TAX
IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION AND ELECTS TO CALCULATE
PASS–THROUGH ENTITY TAXABLE INCOME FOR RESIDENT MEMBERS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A)(8)(I)2 OF THIS SECTION, THE TAX IMPOSED IS
THE SUM OF:
(I) A RATE EQUAL TO THE SUM OF THE RATE OF THE TAX
IMPOSED UNDER § 10–106.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE TOP MARGINAL STATE TAX
RATE FOR INDIVIDUALS UNDER § 10–105(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLIED TO THE SUM
OF EACH RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MEMBER’S DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OR PRO RATA
SHARE OF THE PASS–THROUGH ENTITY’S TAXABLE INCOME AS DESCRIBED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(8)(I)2 OF THIS SECTION;
(II) THE RATE OF THE TAX FOR A CORPORATION UNDER §
10–105(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLIED TO THE SUM OF EACH RESIDENT ENTITY
MEMBER’S DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OR PRO RATA SHARE OF THE PASS–THROUGH
ENTITY’S TAXABLE INCOME AS DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(8)(I)2 OF THIS
SECTION;
(III) A RATE EQUAL TO THE SUM OF THE RATE OF THE TAX
IMPOSED UNDER § 10–106.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND THE TOP MARGINAL STATE TAX
RATE FOR INDIVIDUALS UNDER § 10–105(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLIED TO THE SUM
OF EACH NONRESIDENT INDIVIDUAL MEMBER’S DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OR PRO RATA
SHARE OF THE PASS–THROUGH ENTITY’S NONRESIDENT TAXABLE INCOME; AND
– 63 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) THE RATE OF THE TAX FOR A CORPORATION UNDER §
10–105(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE APPLIED TO THE SUM OF EACH NONRESIDENT ENTITY
MEMBER’S DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OR PRO RATA SHARE OF THE PASS–THROUGH
ENTITY’S NONRESIDENT TAXABLE INCOME.
(6) (I) A PASS–THROUGH ENTITY THAT PAYS THE TAX UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(2)(II)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL INDICATE, IN THE FORM AND MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE
COMPTROLLER, WHETHER THE PASS–THROUGH ENTITY IS CALCULATING THE TAX IN
ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OR (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) IF A PASS–THROUGH ENTITY FAILS TO INDICATE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH THE MANNER IN WHICH
THE PASS–THROUGH ENTITY IS CALCULATING THE TAX, THE TAX SHALL BE
CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(3)] (7) The tax required to be paid for any taxable year by a pass–through
entity may not exceed:
(i) with respect to a pass–through entity that pays the tax imposed
under subsection (b)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (b)(2)(i) of this section,
the sum of all of the nonresident and nonresident entity members’ shares of the pass–through
entity’s distributable cash flow; and
(ii) with respect to a pass–through entity that pays the tax imposed
under subsection (b)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (b)(2)(ii) of this section,
the sum of all of the members’ shares of the pass–through entity’s distributable cash flow.
Chapter 604 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 35. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 5 of this Act shall
take effect January 1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, [2025] 2026.
SECTION 4. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Local Government
20–403.
(a) Except as provided in § 20–404 of this subtitle, a county may impose, by
resolution, a hotel rental tax.
– 64 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to Calvert County, Charles County, and St.
Mary’s County.
(2) The governing body of a county shall hold a public hearing before
imposing a hotel rental tax.
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, Titles 1, 2, and 11 and Title 13,
Subtitle 3 of the Tax – General Article and this title shall prevail to the extent of any conflict
with any local law, ordinance, or resolution relating to the county hotel rental tax.
(d) Beginning January 1, [2028] 2029, Titles 1, 2, and 11 and Title 13, Subtitle 3
of the Tax – General Article and this title shall prevail to the extent of any conflict with an
agreement between a county and an accommodations intermediary.
20–434.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a municipality that
imposes a hotel rental tax may:
(1) provide for the administration and collection of the tax; and
(2) impose penalties for failure to collect, report, or pay the tax.
(b) The Comptroller shall:
(1) collect the municipal hotel rental tax from accommodations
intermediaries in the same manner as the county hotel rental tax under this subtitle; and
(2) distribute to a municipality, before the last day of the next month, the
hotel tax revenue that is collected on behalf of the municipality from an accommodations
intermediary during the preceding month.
(d) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, Title 11 and Title 13, Subtitle 3
of the Tax – General Article and this title shall prevail to the extent of any conflict with
any local law, ordinance, or resolution relating to a municipal hotel rental tax.
(e) Beginning January 1, [2028] 2029, Title 11 and Title 13, Subtitle 3 of the
Tax – General Article and this title shall prevail to the extent of any conflict with an
agreement between a municipality and an accommodations intermediary.
Chapter 638 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, [2027] 2028.
– 65 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 5. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–936.
(a) In this section, “historic motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, including a
passenger vehicle, motorcycle, or truck that:
(1) Is [a model year of 1999 or earlier] AT LEAST 25 YEARS OLD;
(2) Has not been substantially altered from the manufacturer’s original
design; and
(3) Meets criteria contained in regulations adopted by the Administration.
(b) In this section, “historic motor vehicle” does not include a vehicle that has been
remanufactured or reconstructed as a replica of an original vehicle.
(c) If registered with the Administration under this section, every historic motor
vehicle is a Class L (historic) vehicle.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, for each Class L (historic)
vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $45.50; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $55.50.
(e) In applying for registration of a historic motor vehicle under this section, the
owner of the vehicle shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for
which the application is made:
(1) Will be maintained for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours,
and occasional transportation; and
(2) Will not be used:
(i) For general daily transportation;
(ii) Primarily for the transportation of passengers or property on
highways;
(iii) For employment;
– 66 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(iv) For transportation to and from employment or school; or
(v) For commercial purposes.
(f) Except as provided in § 13–936.1 of this subtitle, on registration of a vehicle
under this section, the Administration shall issue a special, historic motor vehicle
registration plate of the size and design that the Administration determines.
(g) Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of
this State as a condition of sale when the vehicle was manufactured, the presence of any
specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this
section.
(h) (1) A vehicle with a model year of 1985 or earlier registered under this
section is exempt from any statute that requires vehicle inspections.
(2) A vehicle registered under this section is exempt from any statute that
requires the use and inspection of emission controls.
(i) (1) For a motor vehicle manufactured at least 60 years prior to the current
model year, there is a onetime registration fee of $50.00.
(2) Registration of a motor vehicle manufactured under this subsection is
not transferable to a subsequent owner.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 212 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, THAT § 5–650.1 OF THE
CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE, AS ENACTED BY SECTION 1 OF THIS
ACT, SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY ONLY PROSPECTIVELY ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND MAY NOT BE APPLIED OR INTERPRETED TO HAVE ANY EFFECT
ON THE ESCHEATMENT OF NONESCHEAT CAPITAL CREDITS BEFORE OCTOBER 1,
2025.
SECTION [2.] 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Chapter 213 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, THAT § 5–650.1 OF THE
CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE, AS ENACTED BY SECTION 1 OF THIS
ACT, SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO APPLY ONLY PROSPECTIVELY ON OR AFTER
OCTOBER 1, 2025, AND MAY NOT BE APPLIED OR INTERPRETED TO HAVE ANY EFFECT
– 67 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ON THE ESCHEATMENT OF NONESCHEAT CAPITAL CREDITS BEFORE OCTOBER 1,
2025.
SECTION [2.] 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Chapter 9 of the Acts of the 2025 Special Session
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(b) There is a Maryland Reparations Commission.
(c) The Commission consists of:
(7) one member of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored
People, [designated by the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People
Maryland State Conference President] APPOINTED JOINTLY BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE AND THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(12) a representative of the Maryland Lynching Truth and Reconciliation
Commission, designated by the Chair of the Commission; [and]
(13) A REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND COMMISSION FOR
AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY AND CULTURE, DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR OF THE
COMMISSION;
(14) ONE FAITH LEADER APPOINTED BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE
SENATE;
(15) ONE FAITH LEADER APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
[(13)] (16) the following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) a mental health expert;
(ii) two historians, with expertise in researching the impacts of
enslavement and housing segregation;
(iii) a representative of a religious institution that serves a community
with a high minority population;
– 68 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(iv) an attorney with expertise in civil rights law or constitutional law;
AND
(v) a representative of an African American financial institution; and
[(vi) two members of the general public]
(17) FOUR MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL PUBLIC, TWO APPOINTED BY
THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND TWO APPOINTED BY THE SPEAKER OF THE
HOUSE.
(g) (1) The Commission shall:
(I) HOLD AT LEAST THREE PUBLIC HEARINGS AND
CONTINUOUSLY SOLICIT PUBLIC INPUT;
[(i)] (II) study and make recommendations relating to appropriate
benefits to be offered to individuals impacted by historical inequality;
[(ii)] (III) on or before [January 1, 2027] SEPTEMBER 1, 2028,
submit a preliminary report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly; and
[(iii)] (IV) on or before [November 1, 2027] DECEMBER 1, 2028,
submit a final report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of [3] 4 years and, at the end of June 30, [2028]
2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated
and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 5. 6. 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the unexpended fiscal
year 2018 special fund appropriation of $980,000 for outdoor recreation land loan – capital
appropriation (K00A05.10) within the Department of Natural Resources allocated to the
College of Southern Maryland may be repurposed for State land acquisition under Program
Open Space.
SECTION 6. 7. 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the
Maryland Health Benefit Exchange (D78Y01) $250,000 from the Child Care Capital
Support Revolving Loan Fund established under § 9.5–113.1 of the Education Article to
conduct an outreach campaign to help child care workers enroll in health insurance and
conduct a survey of the landscape and availability of health insurance among child care
providers.
– 69 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 6. 7. 8. 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the General
Fund the following:
(1) $259,000,000 from the Renewable Portfolio Standard/ACP Account of
the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the
State Government Article;
(2) $187,609,007 $119,151,120 from the Fiscal Responsibility Fund
established under § 7–330 of the State Finance and Procurement Article;
(3) $33,000,000 from the Administration Account of the Maryland
Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05;
(4) $10,000,000 from the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program
Fund for Nurses and Nursing Support Staff established under § 24–1902 of the Health –
General Article Nurse Support Program Assistance Fund established under § 11–405 of the
Education Article; and
(5) $2,000,000 from the Performance Incentive Grant Fund established
under § 9–3209 of the State Government Article;
(6) $2,000,000 from the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission Fund established under § 3–206.1 of the Public Safety Article; and
(7) $1,000,000 $3,500,000 from the Non–Depository Special Fund
established under § 2–120 of the Financial Institutions Article; and
(8) $1,500,000 from the Banking Institution and Credit Union Regulation
Fund established under § 2–118 of the Financial Institutions Article.
SECTION 7. 8. 9. 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the General
Fund $1,038,910 $1,243,484 from the Dedicated Purpose Account established under §
7–310 of the State Finance and Procurement Article for the following purposes:
(1) $355,760 for domestic violence centers;
(2) $201,292 for assisted living centers;
(3) $152,732 for the State Police Gun Center;
(4) $101,537 for police departments to coordinate task forces that cross
jurisdictional boundaries;
– 70 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
(5) $100,001 for the Center for Neuroscience of Social Justice;
(6) $75,988 for violence prevention and interruption organizations; and
(7) $51,600 for the Greater Baltimore Regional Integrated Crisis System;
(8) $197,530 to rebuild State government and modernize human resources
practices; and
(9) $7,044 for food banks.
SECTION 9. 10. 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, on or before June 30, 2026, the Governor may transfer to the General
Fund $380,000,000 from the Local Income Tax Reserve Account established under § 2–606
of the Tax – General Article.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, on or before June 30, 2027, the Governor may transfer to the General Fund
$6,700,000 from the Maternal and Child Health Population Health Improvement Fund
established under § 19–210 of the Health – General Article.
SECTION 9. 10. 11. 14. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding
any other provision of law, on or before June 30, 2027, the Governor may transfer to the
General Fund the following, with the funds for related projects to be replaced with General
Obligation Bonds:
(1) $70,000,000 from the Bay Restoration Fund established under §
9–1605.2 of the Environment Article; and
(2) $13,068,000 $7,011,156 from the Waterway Improvement Fund
established under § 8–707 of the Natural Resources Article; and
(3) $188,844 from the Program Open Space Local Funds that reverted to
and are held in a special account by the Department of Natural Resources under §
5–905(b)(7) of the Natural Resources Article.
SECTION 10. 11. 12. 15. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the fiscal year
2026 General Fund appropriation of $3,000,000 for Facility Operations Administration and
Support (V00E01.02) within the Department of Juvenile Services restricted for the purpose
of reopening the Alfred D. Noyes Children’s Center as an adolescent drug treatment center
may be instead used to provide drug treatment services at other child–serving facilities and
to reopen the Alfred D. Noyes Children’s Center as a facility for children.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, no amounts may be expended in fiscal year 2027 to pay increases over the
– 71 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
rates in effect on January 21, 2026, for providers of nonpublic placements under § 8–406 of
the Education Article.
SECTION 12. 13. 16. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, no amounts may be expended in fiscal year 2027 to pay increases
over the rates in effect on January 21, 2026, for providers with rates set by the Interagency
Rates Committee under § 8–417 of the Education Article.
SECTION 13. 14. 17. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any
other provision of law, the Interagency Commission on School Construction may reallocate
federal funding awarded from fiscal years 2022 and 2023 for heating, ventilation, and
air–conditioning upgrades for public school buildings to ensure compliance with the
provisions of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021.
SECTION 18. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the Comptroller shall set the annual interest rate for a digital advertising
gross revenues tax refund that is the result of a final decision of the highest court of the State
or the United States to which an appeal is taken which finds that the tax imposed under §
7.5–102 of the Tax – General Article is unconstitutional at a percentage, rounded to the
nearest whole number, that is the percentage that equals the average prime rate of interest
quoted by commercial banks to large businesses during the 12 months immediately
preceding the month in which the final decision is rendered, based on a determination by
the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve Bank.
SECTION 19. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Comptroller, in consultation with stakeholders, shall study the impact of
the change in the calculation of Maryland income tax for pass–through entities electing to
be taxed at the entity level as a result of alterations to § 10–102.1 of the Tax – General Article,
as enacted by Section 5 of Chapter 604 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025 and
Sections 4 and 5 of this Act, and alterations to the federal cap on itemized deductions as
enacted by Public Law 119–21.
(b) On or before December 1 each year, the Comptroller shall submit a report on
its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, including:
(1) the operational impact of the changes described under subsection (a) of
this section on the Office of the Comptroller;
(2) an assessment of the potential changes to S corporation elections at the
federal level; and
(3) an analysis of alternative tax calculation options for pass–through
entities for each reporting period.
– 72 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 6
SECTION 20. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of Budget and Management may process a budget amendment
to appropriate funds from the Population Health Improvement Fund, established under §
13–5602 of the Health – General Article, to the Medical Care Programs Administration
within the Maryland Department of Health if the Health Services Cost Review Commission
increases hospital rates to provide financial assistance to Medicare Advantage Plans in
calendar year 2026.
(b) The Health Services Cost Review Commission shall examine:
(1) whether financial assistance to Medicare Advantage Plans is required
to maintain the viability of the plans in calendar year 2026; and
(2) whether hospital rates should be adjusted to provide financial assistance
of up to $140,000,000.
SECTION 21. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, the Developmental Disabilities Administration may use the fiscal year 2027
appropriation for consulting, financial management services, and data analytics, including
artificial intelligence, through:
(1) an expedited procurement as defined in § 13–108(d) of the State Finance
and Procurement Article; or
(2) an interagency agreement as determined to be appropriate in
consultation with the Department of Budget and Management.
SECTION 14. 15. 22. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act
shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 23. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2026.
SECTION 15. 16. 24. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of
this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026. Section 19 of this Act shall remain effective for a
period of 3 years and 7 months and, at the end of December 31, 2029, Section 19 of this Act,
with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.
SECTION 16. 17. 25. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 5 of this
Act shall take effect July 1, 2027 2028, the effective date of Chapter 638 of the Acts of the
General Assembly of 2025, as amended by Section 5 of this Act. If the effective date of
Chapter 638 is further amended, Section 4 5 of this Act shall take effect on the taking effect
of Chapter 638.
– 73 –

Ch. 6 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 18. 26. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 5 6 of this Act
shall take effect July 1, 2027.
SECTION 16. 17. 19. 27. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as
provided in Section 15 Sections 15 and 16 16, 17, and 18 24, 25, and 26 of this Act, this Act
shall take effect June 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2026.
– 74 –